Hawaii statutes.
§602-5.5 Judiciary records. (a)
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the supreme
court shall determine whether, and the extent to which, the judiciary, will
create, accept, retain, or store in electronic form any case, fiscal, and
administrative records and convert written case, fiscal, and administrative
records to electronic records.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section
94-3, the supreme court shall determine the care, custody, and disposition of
all judiciary case, fiscal, and administrative records. A record of
dispositional activity shall be maintained stating whether a record was
retained by the judiciary; transferred to public archives, the University of
Hawaii, the Hawaiian Historical Society; or another agency; or destroyed. This
record shall be kept on forms specified by the supreme court. One copy of the
record shall be filed in the court where the records originated, and the
original shall be filed with the administrative director of the courts or an agency
designated by the director. [L 1984, c 258, §1; am L 1997, c 58, §1; am L 2002,
c 6, §1]

Revision Note

"Hawaiian Historical Society" substituted for
"Hawaii Historical Society" pursuant to §23G-15.

Rules of Court

See Hawaii Court Records Rules; Hawaii Electronic Filing and
Service Rules.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next